Washington statutes.
RCW 16.70.040

Rules—Scope.

(1) The secretary, with the advice and concurrence of the director of the department of agriculture, shall be authorized to develop rules for proposed adoption by the board relating to the importation, movement, sale, transfer, or possession of pet animals as defined in RCW 16.70.020 which are reasonably necessary for the protection and welfare of the people of this state.

(2) The director of the department of agriculture shall also be authorized to adopt rules to allow administration of permits for those pet animals under subsection (1) of this section by the state veterinarian.

[ 1996 c 188 s 5; 1971 c 72 s 4.]